Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,129
Relevant information; refusal to provide; prohibited.

No person shall intentionally or knowingly refuse to provide authorized agencies relevant information pursuant to section 81-5,123.

Laws 1979, LB 301, § 15.